Maine, session 132, LD903.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2429-B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. A, §18, is further
amended to read:
§2429-B. Signs, advertising and marketing
1. Prohibitions. Signs, advertising and marketing used by or on behalf of a registered
caregiver or dispensary may not: are prohibited except as authorized in this section.
A. Be misleading, deceptive or false;
B. Involve mass-market advertising or marketing campaigns that have a high
likelihood of reaching persons under 21 years of age or that are specifically designed
to appeal particularly to persons under 21 years of age;
C. Be placed or otherwise used within 1,000 feet of the property line of a preexisting
public or private school, except that, if a municipality chooses to prohibit the placement
or use of signs or advertising by or on behalf of a registered caregiver or dispensary at
distances greater than or less than 1,000 feet but not less than 500 feet from the property
line of a preexisting public or private school, that greater or lesser distance applies;
D. Violate any other requirement or restriction on signs, advertising and marketing
imposed by the department by rule pursuant to subsection 2; or
E. Market to any person authorized to possess cannabis plants or harvested cannabis
under this chapter and specifically to any adult use or recreational cannabis market
within the same sign, advertisement or marketing material.
1-A. Authorized activity. A registered caregiver or dispensary may:
A. Establish a publicly accessible website or other Internet-based presence that
provides general information on the registered caregiver's or dispensary's contact
information, location and hours and a list of products available;
B. Be listed in business directories; and
C. Display a sign on the premises of the registered caregiver or dispensary, except that
a sign on the premises may not:
(1) Be misleading, deceptive or false;
(2) Be designed to appeal specifically to or have a high likelihood of appealing
specifically to persons under 21 years of age;
(3) Include any health or physical benefit claims, except that the sign may contain
qualifying patients' testimonials of how cannabis for medical use has provided
palliative or therapeutic effects for the patients' conditions. All testimonials must
contain the following disclaimer: "This statement has not been evaluated by the
United States Food and Drug Administration. This product is not intended to
diagnose, treat, cure or prevent any disease.";
(4) Be placed or otherwise used within 1,000 feet of the property line of a
preexisting public or private school, except that, if a municipality by ordinance or
other regulation chooses to prohibit the placement or use of signs or advertising by
or on behalf of a registered caregiver or dispensary at distances greater than or less
Page 1 - 132LR0805(01)

411 than 1,000 feet but not less than 500 feet from the property line of a preexisting
422 public or private school, that greater or lesser distance applies;
(5) Contain any information regarding adult use cannabis pursuant to Title 28-B;
(6) Violate any other requirement or restriction regarding signs imposed by
ordinance or other regulation by the municipality where the registered caregiver or
dispensary operates; or
(7) Violate any other requirement or restriction regarding signs imposed by the
office by rule pursuant to subsection 2.
2. Rules on signs, advertising and marketing. The department shall office may
adopt rules regarding the placement and use of signs, advertising and marketing by or on
behalf of a registered caregiver or dispensary, which may include, but are not limited to:.
A. A prohibition on health or physical benefit claims in advertising or marketing,
including, but not limited to, health or physical benefit claims on the label or packaging
of harvested cannabis, except that advertising, marketing, labeling or packaging may
contain qualifying patients' testimonials of how cannabis for medical use has provided
palliative or therapeutic effects for the patients' conditions. All testimonials must
contain the following disclaimer: "This statement has not been evaluated by the United
States Food and Drug Administration. This product is not intended to diagnose, treat,
cure or prevent any disease";
B. A prohibition on unsolicited advertising or marketing on the Internet, including, but
not limited to, banner advertisements on mass-market websites;
C. A prohibition on opt-in advertising or marketing that does not permit an easy and
permanent opt-out feature; and
D. A prohibition on advertising or marketing directed toward location-based devices
unless such marketing includes a permanent and easy opt-out feature and the owner of
the device is 21 years of age or older.
Sec. 2. 28-B MRSA §702, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §§123 to 125, is
further amended to read:
§702. Signs, advertising and marketing
1. Prohibitions. Signs, advertising and marketing used by or on behalf of a licensee:
are prohibited except as authorized in this section.
A. May not be misleading, deceptive or false;
C. May not be placed or otherwise used within 1,000 feet of the property line of a
preexisting public or private school, except that, if a municipality by ordinance or other
regulation, or, in the case of a town, plantation or township located in the unorganized
and deorganized areas, the Maine Land Use Planning Commission, chooses to prohibit
the placement or use of signs or advertising by or on behalf of a cannabis establishment
at distances greater than or less than 1,000 feet but not less than 500 feet from the
property line of a preexisting public or private school, that greater or lesser distance
applies. As used in this paragraph, "school" has the same meaning as in section 402,
subsection 2, paragraph A; and
Page 2 - 132LR0805(01)

D. May not violate any other requirement or restriction on signs, advertising and
marketing imposed by the office by rule pursuant to subsection 2.
1-A. Authorized activity. A licensee may:
A. Establish a publicly accessible website or other Internet-based presence that
provides general information on the licensee's contact information, location and hours
and a list of products available;
B. Be listed in business directories; and
C. Display a sign on the licensed premises, except that a sign on the licensed premises
may not:
(1) Be misleading, deceptive or false;
(2) Be designed to appeal specifically to or have a high likelihood of appealing
specifically to persons under 21 years of age;
(3) Include any health or physical benefit claims;
(4) Be placed or otherwise used within 1,000 feet of the property line of a
preexisting public or private school, except that, if a municipality by ordinance or
other regulation, or, in the case of a town, plantation or township located in the
unorganized and deorganized areas, the Maine Land Use Planning Commission,
chooses to prohibit the placement or use of signs or advertising by or on behalf of
a cannabis establishment at distances greater than or less than 1,000 feet but not
less than 500 feet from the property line of a preexisting public or private school,
that greater or lesser distance applies. As used in this subparagraph, "school" has
the same meaning as in section 402, subsection 2, paragraph A;
(5) Contain any information regarding cannabis for medical use pursuant to Title
22, chapter 558-C;
(6) Violate any other requirement or restriction regarding signs imposed by
ordinance or other regulation by the municipality where the licensee operates; or
(7) Violate any other requirement or restriction regarding signs imposed by the
office by rule pursuant to subsection 2.
2. Rules on signs, advertising and marketing. The office may adopt rules regarding
the placement and use of signs, advertising and marketing by or on behalf of a licensee,
which may include, but are not limited to:.
A. A prohibition on health or physical benefit claims in advertising or marketing,
including, but not limited to, health or physical benefit claims on the label or packaging
of adult use cannabis or an adult use cannabis product;
B. A prohibition on unsolicited advertising or marketing on the Internet, including, but
not limited to, banner advertisements on mass-market websites;
C. A prohibition on opt-in advertising or marketing that does not permit an easy and
permanent opt-out feature;
D. A prohibition on advertising or marketing directed toward location-based devices,
including, but not limited to, cellular telephones, unless the marketing is a mobile
Page 3 - 132LR0805(01)

411 device application installed on the device by the owner of the device who is 21 years
422 of age or older and includes a permanent and easy opt-out feature; and
E. Limitations on signs, advertising and marketing specifically designed to target
minors regarding adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products.
3. Restrictions on signs, advertising and marketing. A licensee may advertise or
market the promotion of the licensee's business and adult use cannabis and adult use
cannabis products sold by the licensee, including the display of a sign on the licensed
premises and off the licensed premises on the exterior of a motor vehicle in accordance
with this section.
4. Voluntary sign, advertising and marketing approval. A licensee may submit to
the office a request for approval of any sign, advertisement or marketing materials the
licensee intends to use. The request must include the following information as applicable:
A. A digital or physical sample of the sign, advertisement or marketing materials for
which approval is requested; and
B. Any additional information required on the sign, advertisement or marketing
materials approval request form provided by the office and available on the office's
publicly accessible website.
The office may not refuse to review any voluntary request for approval. The office may
deny any sign, advertisement or marketing materials it determines do does not comply with
this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. Within 30 days of submission of
the request, the office shall issue a written decision either approving or denying the request,
including the reason for denial, if applicable. If the request is approved, the office may not
take any enforcement action of any kind against the licensee solely for using the approved
sign, advertisement or marketing materials.